Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska48-1710
Department; licensing duties; license; protest; term; renewal; fee.

(1) The department shall conduct an investigation of each applicant's character, competence, and reliability and any other matters relating to the applicant's operations as a farm labor contractor.

(2) The department shall issue a license within fifteen days of receipt of the application if the department determines that the applicant is of satisfactory character, competence, and reliability.

(3) Any person may protest the issuance of a license to any applicant at any time by filing with the department a written statement detailing such person's reasons for protesting.

(4) The licensing year shall run from April 1 to the following March 31 and each license shall expire on March 31 following the date of its issuance unless sooner revoked by the department.

(5) A license shall be renewed annually upon payment in advance of the required fee, except that the Commissioner of Labor may require any person seeking renewal to file a new application and may conduct a new investigation of the applicant's character, competence, and reliability and any other matters relating to the applicant's operations as a farm labor contractor.

(6) On its own initiative or upon receipt of a complaint or notice that a farm labor contractor is in violation of the Farm Labor Contractors Act, the department shall conduct an investigation of such contractor.

Laws 1987, LB 344, § 10;

Laws 2002, LB 931, § 4.